Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202438-2051
Physician assistants; compact privilege.

A person holding a compact privilege to practice in Nebraska under the Physician Assistant (PA) Licensure Compact may act as a physician assistant as authorized pursuant to such compact.

Laws 2024, LB1215, § 12.
Physician Assistant (PA) Licensure Compact, see section 38-4601.